Missouri, session 2026, HB3367.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.414, to read as follows:
9.414. June twentieth each year is hereby designated as "John Goodman day" in
2 Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate events
3 and activities to honor the many accomplishments of the acclaimed actor, born in
4 Affton, Missouri, in 1952.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.